North Dakota, session 69, HB1043.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 61-02-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
61-02-08. Meetings of commission.
The commission shall hold at least one meeting every two months at places as it, by resolution,
may provide. The governor shall serve as chairman, and the commission shall select a member of the
commission to serve as vice chairman. The chairman, or in the chairman's absence or disability, the
vice chairman of the commission, may issue a call for any meeting at any time. The governor or
governor's appointed representative shall preside at all meetings of the commission, and in case of the
absence or disability of the governor and governor's appointed representative, the vice chairman shall
preside.

H. B. NO. 1043 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1043.
House Vote: Yeas 89 Nays 0 Absent 5
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 1 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State